Illinois, session 104th, HB2938.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 7Chicago, Illinois to Milwaukee, Wisconsin passenger rail 8service. 9    Section 10. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that 10amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 11Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 12Chicago, Illinois to Madison, Wisconsin passenger rail 13service. 14    Section 15. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that 15amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 16Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 17Chicago, Illinois to Rockford, Illinois passenger rail 18service. 19    Section 20. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that 20amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 21Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for the   HB2938- 2 -LRB104 08855 LNS 18910 b1Chicago, Illinois to Moline, Illinois passenger rail service. 2    Section 25. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that 3amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 4Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 5Chicago, Illinois to Galesburg, Illinois to Quincy, Illinois 6passenger rail service. 7    Section 30. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that 8amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 9Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 10Chicago, Illinois to Peoria, Illinois passenger rail service. 11    Section 35. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that 12amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 13Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 14Chicago, Illinois to East St. Louis, Illinois passenger rail 15service. 16    Section 40. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that 17amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 18Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 19Chicago, Illinois to Carbondale, Illinois passenger rail 20service. 21    Section 45. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that   HB2938- 3 -LRB104 08855 LNS 18910 b1amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 2Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 180 3miles per hour high-speed line passenger rail service. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 52025.